Utah statutes.
76-5-404.   Forcible sexual abuse.
(1) A person commits forcible sexual abuse if the victim is 14 years of age or
older and, under circumstances not amounting to rape, object rape, sodomy, or
attempted rape or sodomy, the actor touches the anus, buttocks, or any part of
the genitals of another, or touches the breast of a female, or otherwise takes
indecent liberties with another, or causes another to take indecent liberties
with the actor or another, with intent to cause substantial emotional or
bodily pain to any person or with the intent to arouse or gratify the sexual
desire of any person, without the consent of the other, regardless of the sex
of any participant.
(2)  Forcible sexual abuse is:
(a)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a felony of the second degree,
punishable by a term of imprisonment of not less than one year nor more than
15 years; or
(b)  except as provided in Subsection (3), a felony of the first degree,
punishable by imprisonment for 15 years and which may be for life, if the
trier of fact finds that during the course of the commission of the forcible
sexual abuse the defendant caused serious bodily injury to another.
(3)  If, when imposing a sentence under Subsection (2)(b), a court finds that
a lesser term than the term described in Subsection (2)(b) is in the interests
of justice and states the reasons for this finding on the record, the court
may impose a term of imprisonment of not less than:
(a)  10 years and which may be for life; or
(b)  six years and which may be for life.
(4)  Imprisonment under Subsection (2)(b) or (3) is mandatory in accordance
with Section 76-3-406.
